Utah statutes.
26-1-17.   Executive director -- Power to prescribe rules for administration and government of department.

The executive director shall prescribe rules not inconsistent with law for the administration and government of the department, the conduct of its employees and the custody, use and preservation of the records, papers, books, documents, and property of the department.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

